Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 2. Disposal of Dead Poultry.

§ 3.2-6024.
Definitions.

As used in this article unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Composting”
means the natural process in which beneficial microbes reduce dead poultry into a biologically safe by-product.

“Dead poultry”
means poultry, exclusive of those intentionally slaughtered, that die as a result of disease, injury, or of natural causes, upon any premises in the Commonwealth.

“Disposal”
means to put dead poultry into a landfill or the complete destruction of dead poultry in an incinerator or a disposal pit, or by rendering or composting.

“Disposal pit”
means an opening dug in the ground to a minimum depth of six feet, containing a minimum capacity of 150 cubic feet, covered with a minimum of 12 inches of dirt, and provided with one or more openings for the introduction of poultry therein. Openings shall be of a minimum size of eight inches square and equipped with tight lids.

“Incinerator”
means a device designed for treatment of waste by combustion.

“Landfill”
means an area permitted by the Department of Environmental Quality allowing the disposal of dead poultry.

“Person”
means any person who engages in the raising or keeping of poultry for profit in the Commonwealth.

“Poultry”
means all chickens, ducks, turkeys, or other domestic fowls being raised or kept on any premises in the Commonwealth for profit.

“Premises”
means the entire tract of land including the buildings thereon, owned, leased, or used by any person for the raising or keeping of poultry for profit.

“Raising or keeping of poultry for profit”
means the raising or keeping of 500 or more poultry at one time for the purpose of sale of such poultry or the eggs produced therefrom.

“Rendering”
means treating dead poultry according to the process described in 9 C.F.R. § 82.1.

History.

1992, c. 101, § 3.1-742.1; 2008, c. 860.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Agriculture, § 13.

§ 3.2-6025.
Proper disposal of dead poultry required of any person raising or keeping poultry for profit.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the raising or keeping of poultry for profit on any premises, or to enter into a contract to raise or keep poultry for profit for another person, without providing for the disposal of dead poultry using either: (i) a disposal pit; (ii) a landfill; (iii) incineration; (iv) composting; or (v) rendering.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-583.2; 1962, c. 157; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-743; 1992, c. 101; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6026.
Disposal of dead poultry.

It shall be unlawful for any person engaged in the raising or keeping of poultry for profit to dispose of dead poultry on his premises in any manner except in a disposal pit, landfill, incinerator, or by composting or rendering.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-583.4; 1962, c. 157; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-745; 1992, c. 101; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6027.
Transportation of dead poultry.

The State Veterinarian may specify requirements governing the transportation of dead poultry.

History.

1992, c. 101, § 3.1-745.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6028.
Exemptions from provisions of article.

The State Veterinarian may authorize disposal of dead poultry by a method other than as provided in §

3.2-6025

or

3.2-6026

if he determines that the alternative method meets standards for disposal of dead poultry.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-583.5; 1962, c. 157; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-746; 1972, c. 90; 1992, c. 101; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6029.
Regulations.

The Board is authorized to adopt regulations concerning the specifications of disposal pits, incinerators, composting and rendering and all other matters within the purview and scope of this article to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-583.6; 1962, c. 157; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-747; 1992, c. 101; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6030.
Applicability.

Nothing in this article shall apply to the disposal of entire flocks of dead poultry governed by regulations adopted pursuant to §

3.2-6002

.

History.

1992, c. 101, § 3.1-748.1; 2008, c. 860.